Utah statutes.
58-5a-306.   Exemptions from licensure.

The following persons may practice podiatry, subject to stated circumstances and limitations, without being licensed under this chapter:

(1)  a podiatric physician serving in the armed forces of the United States, the United States Public Health Service, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or other federal agencies while engaged in activities regulated under this chapter as a part of his employment with that federal agency if the individual holds a valid license to practice podiatry issued by any other state or jurisdiction recognized by the division;

(2)  a student engaged in activities that constitute the practice of podiatry while in training in a recognized school approved by the division to the extent the activities are under the supervision of qualified faculty or staff and the activities are a defined part of the training program;

(3)  a person engaged in an internship, residency, preceptorship, postceptorship, fellowship, apprenticeship, or on-the-job training program approved by the division while under the supervision of qualified persons;

(4)  a person residing in another state and licensed to practice podiatry there, who is called in for a consultation by a person licensed in this state and services provided are limited to that consultation or who is invited by a recognized school, association, society, or other body approved by the division to conduct a lecture, clinic, or demonstration of the practice of podiatry so long as that individual does not establish a place of business or regularly engage in the practice of podiatry in the state;

(5)  a person licensed under the laws of this state to practice or engage in any other occupation or profession while engaged in the lawful, professional, and competent practice of that occupation or profession; and

(6)  persons who fit or sell corrective shoes, arch supports, or similar devices, to the extent their acts and practices involve only the fitting and selling of these items.



Amended by Chapter 232, 1996 General Session

